Hawaii, session 2026, GM1362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1, Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding three new sections to part XII to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§291C- Safe riding behavior; electric bicycles. (a)
All electric bicycles shall be operated with all wheels on the
ground at all times with the operator facing forward and seated
normally; provided that it shall not be a violation of this
subsection if the wheels lose contact with the ground briefly
due to the conditions of the road surface or other circumstances
beyond the control of the operator.
(b) The following shall be prohibited while operating an
electric bicycle:
(1) Operating an electric bicycle in an unsafe manner or
engaging in exhibition riding, such as wheelies or
stunts, on any public street, alley, or other public
right-of-way; provided that this paragraph shall not
apply to a person engaging in exhibition riding as
2026-2941 HB2021 GDI HMSO
liINMIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIHIIIIII

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
part of a parade, tournament, or other activity
permitted by a state or county government agency;
(2) Standing or kneeling on any seat, riding on the
handlebars, or engaging in any other non-standard
riding£ositi^on2 aild
(3) Engaging in any other maneuver that endangers the
operator, passenger, or the general public, or that
demonstrates reckless or negligent operation of the
electric bicycle.
(c) The department of transportation and each county may
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to define additional unsafe
or reckless behaviors consistent with this section.
§291C- Operating a high-speed electric device. (a) No
person shall operate a high-speed electric device on a public
roadway, a bicycle lane, a travel path, a bicycle facility, or
other public area, such as a street, highway, or sidewalk.
(b) Violation of this section shall constitute a traffic
infraction pursuant to chapter 291D. In the case of a violator
under the age of eighteen, enforcement may be applied against
the parent or legal guardian or addressed through non-monetary
corrective action.
2026-2941 HB2021 GDI HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
§291C- Electric bicycles; insurance exemption. Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to require insurance for the
operation of a road-legal, permitted, and classified electric
bicycle."
SECTION 2. Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part XIII to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§291C- Electric bicycle regulations; labels; signage;
public information. (a) Manufacturers and distributors of
electric bicycles shall apply a label that is permanently
affixed, in a prominent location, to each electric bicycle. The
label shall contain the electric bicycle's:
(1) Classification number (class 1, 2, or 3);
(2) Top assisted speed; and
(3) Motor wattage.
No person shall alter, deface, or remove a label required
pursuant to this subsection.
(b) Distributors of electric bicycles shall place a sign
at or near the point of sale with wording substantially similar
to the following in all capital letters and printed in no less
than fourteen-point font:
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO
ffliiiiMiliiioaiiiiiiii

Page 4 2021
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D, 2
C.D. 1
”THE SALE AND OPERATION OF ELECTRIC BICYCLES IS REGULATED
UNDER CHAPTER 291C, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES. CERTAIN USES
AND RIDERS MAY BE RESTRICTED BY LAW."
(c) Distributors of electric bicycles shall provide to the
purchaser of an electric bicycle a booklet or pamphlet detailing
the associated state laws regulating the use of electric
bicycles in this chapter.
(d) Sellers and distributors, including online or
third-party platform sellers and distributors delivering or
offering for delivery to the State, of electric bicycles shall
disclose in writing whether the electric bicycle being sold is
legal for use on public roads, sidewalks, or bikes lanes.
Disclosures shall include registration, equipment, helmet, and
age requirements.
(e) The department of transportation may impose
administrative fines not to exceed $500 per violation of
noncompliance with this section. The department of
transportation may inspect premises of manufacturers,
distributors, or sellers or investigate complaints to ensure
compliance with this section.
2026-2941 HB2021 GDI HMSO 4
■imniiiiiiiiiiiiHi

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(f) The department of transportation shall adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purpose of this
section.''
SECTION 3. Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part XVI to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§291C- Driving mopeds and electric motorcycles on
bicycle lanes and paths; prohibited. (a) No person shall
operate a moped or electric motorcycle on a bicycle path,
bicycle lane, or any other path or roadway designated for
bicycle use.
(b) For purposes of this section, "electric motorcycle”
means a two- or three-wheeled vehicle equipped with an electric
motor capable of exceeding a speed of twenty-eight miles per
hour on level ground, and that may be legally operated on public
roadways under the same licensing, registration, and insurance
requirements applicable to motorcycles under state law."
SECTION 4. Section 249-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read:
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
'"’Electric bicycle” means a bicycle equipped with fully
operable pedals and an electric motor of no more than seven
hundred fifty watts."
2. By amending the definition of "bicycle" to read:
""Bicycle" means:
(1) A device propelled solely by human power upon which
any person may ride, having two tandem wheels
[oiatoen] twelve inches in diameter or greater, and
including any device generally recognized as a bicycle
though equipped with two front or two rear wheels; or
(2) [A low-opcod] An electric bicycle [-?—as—defined-
title 15 United States Code -ocction 2085] . "
SECTION 5. Section 249-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) [A low-speed] An electric bicycle [7—as—defined us-der
title 15 Unirtod Stat-es Code section 20-85,] shall be required to
be registered, and shall be subject to a permanent registration
fee of $30, to be paid by the owners thereof to the director of
finance. No person shall operate an electric bicycle on a
public roadway, sidewalk, or bicycle facility unless it has been
properly registered pursuant to this subsection. Failure to
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO
■iiiniiiiiiiiiiiiwni

Page 7
H.B. NO. Sfi
C.D. 1
register may result in citation or temporary impoundment by a
law enforcement officer or designated official pursuant to
section 249-15.
The department of transportation may adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to coordinate statewide implementation, provide
uniform forms and guidance, and support public education and
outreach on the registration requirement for electric bicycles
pursuant to this subsection.”
SECTION 6. Section 249-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§249-15 Seizure and sale. (a) The directors of finance,
any person authoritatively acting on behalf of the director of
finance, or any member of a police force of the several counties
of the State may seize any bicycle or moped liable for the
payment of the required fees or which has no tag or decal
affixed as required by section 249-14 for bicycles, or license
plate and tag or emblem affixed as required by section 249-14.1
for mopeds, and may hold the bicycle or moped for a period of
ten days, during which time it shall be subject to redemption by
its owner on payment of the fee due and a penalty of $25. All
bicycles and mopeds not so redeemed shall be sold by the county
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO
iiniiiiiiiiliiiiiiiigiii

Page 8 H.B. NO. "'2
C.D. 1
chief of police or director of finance or their authorized
representative, at public auction after first giving five days
public notice of the time and place of sale in the county where
the sale is to be held. Sale shall be made for the best price
obtainable, which amount shall be forthwith paid over to the
director of finance, accompanied by a statement containing a
description of the bicycles or mopeds, their serial number,
makes, and any other marks of identification. The director of
finance, after deducting from the amount so received the amount
of the fee and penalty due and costs of giving public notice,
shall pay any surplus to the previous registered owners of the
bicycles or mopeds. If at the expiration of ninety days the
previous registered owners remain unknown, the surplus shall be
paid into the treasury of the county, as a government
realization, and all claims to the sums shall be forever barred.
(b) The directors of finance, any person authoritatively
acting on behalf of a director of finance, or any member of a
police force of the several counties of the State may seize any
non-road-legal or nonconforming electric bicycle or high-speed
electric device, as defined in section 291C-1, for violations
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 8
HIIIIHIIIillllMIIIOIW

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
under this chapter or other applicable state law, including
chapters 286 and 291C.
(c) For purposes of this section:
"Non-road-legal” means not authorized for operation on a
public roadway under this chapter or other applicable state law,
including chapters 286 and 291C.
"Nonconforming" means not in compliance with the
classification, labeling, equipment, or operational requirements
established under chapter 291C.
(d) The department of transportation may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to further define non-road-legal,
nonconforming electric bicycles or high-speed electric devices
for purposes of enforcement of this section."
SECTION 7. Section 286-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
1. By amending the definition of "moped" to read:
""Moped" means a device upon which a person may ride that
has :
(1) Two or three wheels in contact with the ground;
(2) A motor having a maximum power output capability
measured at the motor output shaft, in accordance with
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO
liiiiiimiiiiiniBiiiiii

Page 10 H.B. NO. “"2
C.D. 1
SAE International standards, of two horsepower (one
thousand four hundred ninety-two watts) or less and,
if it is a combustion engine, a maximum piston or
rotor displacement of 3.05 cubic inches (fifty cubic
centimeters) and that will propel the moped,
unassisted, on a level surface at a maximum speed no
greater than thirty miles per hour; and
(3) A direct or automatic power drive system that requires
no clutch or gear shift operation by the moped driver
after the drive system is engaged with the power unit.
"Moped" does not include an electric foot scooter [t-] or electric
micro-mobility device, as defined in section 291C-1."
2. By deleting the definition of "bicycle".
[""Bicycle" moanoi
4-1-)- A device propelled solely by human power upon which
any person may ride,—having two tandem wheels sixteen
-iaehes-arft—diaiftete^-e35——and including any
device-generally recognized as a bicycle though
equipped with two front or two rear wheels;—ar
-(-34- A—iew—speed—electrie—bieyeieT—as—de^iaed—under^^feiPie
id—Baited—States—Gede—seetieft—3^-8-5-r" ]
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 10

Page 11
H.B. NO. h
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 8. Section 291-31.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending its title and subsection (a) to read as
follows:
"§291-31.5 Blue lights prohibited for motor vehicles,
motorcycles, motor scooters, bicycles, electric foot scooters,
electric micro-mobility devices, and mopeds. (a) No person
shall knowingly operate, affix or cause to be affixed, display,
or possess any lamp, reflector, or illumination device that
appears to be the color blue, or colors blue and red, upon any
motor vehicle, motorcycle, motor scooter, bicycle, electric foot
scooter, electric micro-mobility device as defined in section
291C-1, or moped, except for:
(1) County law enforcement vehicles authorized and
approved by the chief of police of the county in which
the vehicle is operated;
(2) Department of law enforcement vehicles with blue and
red lamps, reflectors, or illumination devices
authorized and approved by the director of law
enforcement; or
(3) Department of land and natural resources division of
conservation and resources enforcement vehicles with
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO

IIIUIIIiliilillllllllllH

Page 12 2021
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D, 2
C.D. 1
blue and red lamps, reflectors, or illumination
devices authorized and approved by the chairperson of
the board of land and natural resources.
This prohibition shall not apply to factory-installed
instrument illumination."
SECTION 9. Section 291C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding six new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read:
""Class 1 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle
equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the
rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the
bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour.
"Class 2 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle
equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the
bicycle and is not capable of providing assistance when the
bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour.
"Class 3 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle
equipped with:
(1) A motor that provides assistance only when the rider
is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 1
iiiimnniiiniiiiiiiinii

Page 13 H.B. NO. Sg*.
C.D. 1
bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per
hour; and
(2) A speedometer.
"Electric bicycle" means a bicycle equipped with fully
operable pedals and an electric motor of no more than seven
hundred fifty watts. "Electric bicycle" does not include a
high-speed electric device.
"Electric micro-mobility device" means a device weighing no
more than seventy-five pounds that is fully or partially
motorized and used for personal transportation, such as one-
wheels and electric skateboards. "Electric micro-mobility
device" does not include electric bicycles or electric foot
scooters.
"High-speed electric device" means any device with a motor
exceeding seven hundred fifty watts and capable of speeds over
twenty-eight miles per hour. "High-speed electric device" does
not include:
(1) A moped or motor vehicle that is registered as
required by law to operate on public roadways;
(2) A motor vehicle that is specifically exempted from
registration in section 286-41; or
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 13

Page 14
H.B. NO. h
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(3) An electric vehicle as defined in section 196-2."
2. By amending the definition of "bicycle" to read:
""Bicycle" means:
(1) A vehicle propelled solely by human power upon which
any person may ride, having two tandem wheels, and
including any vehicle generally recognized as a
bicycle though equipped with two front or two rear
wheels except a toy bicycle; or
(2) [A low-speed] electric bicycle[7—as defined under
title 15 United States Code seGt-j.-on- 2-685-] ."
SECTION 10. Section 291C-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) No person shall drive any vehicle other than a
bicycle, electric foot scooter, electric micro-mobility device,
or moped upon a bicycle lane or bicycle path, except upon a
permanent or authorized temporary driveway, or park any vehicle
upon a bicycle lane or bicycle path; provided that any vehicle
may be driven or parked in a bicycle lane or bicycle path as
applicable if[-f-] it is:
(1) [-it—ie—ift] In the process of executing a legal turn,
lane change, or parking maneuver;
2026-2941 HB2021 GDI HMSO 14
iiiiiiiniiiiHiiiiiinii

Page 15
H.B. NO. £2
C.D. 1
(2) [I-t 3rs an] An authorized emergency vehicle performing
the functions under section 291C-26;
(3) [It ioaft] An official federal, state, or county
vehicle in the performance of its actual duty;
(4) [-Pt—is—a] A stalled or broken vehicle;
(5) [It io nccGsoary] Necessary to assist a stalled or
broken vehicle;
(6) [It io ncccooary] Necessary to yield to an authorized
emergency vehicle pursuant to section 291C-65; or
(7) [it' -is -o-the-r-wio'e] Otherwise provided by law."
SECTION 11. Section 291C-139, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t] §2910-139 [•}•] Electric foot scooters [—] ; electric
micro-mobility devices. (a) This section shall apply whenever
an electric foot scooter or electric micro-mobility device is
operated upon any highway, street, roadway, or other designated
public area set aside for the use of electric foot scooters [-r]
or electric micro-mobility devices.
(b) Every person operating an electric foot scooter or
electric micro-mobility device upon a roadway shall be granted
all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO
lUlllllllilllllllBHIiin

Page 16
H.B. NO. f
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
applicable to a driver of a vehicle under this chapter, except
as to provisions of this:
(1) Section to the contrary; and
(2) Chapter that, by their nature, can have no
application.
(c) The counties by ordinance shall regulate operations of
electric foot scooters and electric micro-mobility devices with
regard to, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Operations in or upon roadways, bikeways, bicycle
paths, and sidewalks;
(2) Storage and docking locations;
(3) Restrictions on maximum speed;
(4) Safety considerations; and
(5) Insurance requirements;
provided that no authority adopted in accordance with this
subsection shall be less restrictive than the requirements set
forth in this section.
(d) No person under fifteen years of age shall operate an
electric foot scooter or electric micro-mobility device on a
highway, street, roadway, or any other public property in the
State. No person under [-aixteeft] eighteen years of age shall
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 16
lillllllllOMUIOillll

Page 17
H.B. NO. I’l
C.D. 1
operate an electric foot scooter or electric micro-mobility
device unless the person wears a safety helmet securely fastened
with a chin strap. The safety helmet shall meet the
specifications of and requirements for a bicycle helmet as set
out in section 291C-150.
(e) No person shall operate an electric foot scooter or
electric micro-mobility device that is carrying any other
person, nor shall any person other than the operator ride upon
an electric foot scooter [-r-] or electric micro-mobility device.
(f) No person operating an electric foot scooter or
electric micro-mobility device shall carry any package, bundle,
or article that prevents the use of both hands in the control
and operation of the electric foot scooter[—] or electric micro­
mobility device.
(g) Any electric foot scooter or electric micro-mobility
device used from thirty minutes after sunset until thirty
minutes before sunrise shall meet the specifications of and
requirements for lamps and other equipment on bicycles as set
out in section 291C-147; provided that in lieu of the
requirement of section 291C-147(b), every electric foot scooter
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO


Page 18
H.B. NO.
“’2
C.D. 1
or electric micro-mobility device shall be equipped with a
lighted lamp that is visible from the rear.
(h) No person shall operate an electric foot scooter or
electric micro-mobility device at a speed other than is
reasonable and prudent and having regard to the actual and
potential hazards and conditions then existing; provided that no
person shall operate an electric foot scooter or electric micro­
mobility device at a speed greater than fifteen miles per hour.
(i) Any person who operates an electric foot scooter or
electric micro-mobility device recklessly in disregard of the
safety of persons or property shall be assessed penalties as set
forth in section 291C-161(b).
(j) A person or entity that provides electric foot
scooters or electric micro-mobility devices for hire shall not
rent or lease an electric foot scooter or electric micro­
mobility device to any person unless:
(1) Each renter or lessee that is under the age of
[ei^eteeft'] eighteen wears a safety helmet, as required
by subsection (d), while operating the electric foot
scooter [-^] or electric micro-mobility device; and
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO

iiiiiinimiiiiiiiM

Page 19
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Each renter or lessee is provided with a copy of the
electric foot scooter and electric micro-mobility
device ordinances or rules that have been adopted by
the applicable county.
(k) Electric foot scooters and electric micro-mobility
devices shall only be stored or docked at specific locations
that shall be authorized by the counties."
SECTION 12. Section 291C-143.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
is amended to read as follows:
" [-{•] §291C-143.5 Low-opeed oloGtrio bioyeloo; ] Electric
bicycles; operator age. (a) No person under the age of
[•f-arfteeft] sixteen shall operate a [iew—speed] class 2 or class 3
electric bicycle [as defined under title 15 United Stateo Code
section 2085.] unless under the direct supervision of a parent
or guardian.
(b) For purposes of this section, "direct supervision"
means a supervising parent, guardian, or person eighteen years
of age or older is physically present and in reasonable
proximity to observe and control the operation of the electric
bicycle."
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 19
iiiiiHiiiiHiiiHiiiinin

Page 20
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 13. Section 291C-145, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows:
"(g) No person shall ride a bicycle equipped with a motor
on any sidewalkb—J; provided that a person may ride a class 1
electric bicycle, class 2 electric bicycle, or class 3 electric
bicycle on a sidewalk at a speed not exceeding ten miles per
hour, except in business districts or where prohibited by county
ordinance; provided that a county may establish by ordinance
additional reasonable restrictions on the operation of any class
of electric bicycle on a sidewalk. The counties may, by
ordinance, post bicycle lanes and bicycle paths to prevent
persons riding a bicycle equipped with a motor from using them."
SECTION 14. Section 291C-150, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) No person under [eixfeeeft] eighteen years of age shall
operate a bicycle upon a street, a bikeway, or any other public
property unless that person is wearing a properly fitted and
fastened bicycle helmet that has been tested by a nationally
recognized agency such as the National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration, [the] National Safety Council, or [the]
Children's Safety Network, and is designed to fit the user and
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 2
iiiiiniiiiiiniiioiwiii

Page 21 2021
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
protect against head trauma. This requirement ^haj^ also
[appiies-] apply to a person who rides upon a bicycle while in a
restraining seat that is attached to the bicycle or who rides in
a trailer towed by the bicycle.
(b) A person who provides bicycles for hire shall not rent
a bicycle to any person unless every person who is under age
[oixtoon] eighteen is wearing a bicycle helmet, as required in
subsection (a), while operating the rented bicycle, occupying a
restraining seat that is attached to the rented bicycle, or
riding in a trailer towed by the rented bicycle."
SECTION 15. Section 291C-197, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
[i-97—Driving mopedo on bicycle lanea and paths.
-(a-)-- Whcrovor bicycle lanes arc provided on--<-he roadway,—moped
drivers—£>h-a-ll use such bicycle lanes.
-- The director of transportation by rule and the
count-ies by ordinanee-may w-ith respect to bicye-l-O'pa-th-s ■ under
feteeir^-respeetive—restrdret—u&e—ef-
ouch bicycle pa-IAs by mopedo.-- SignO" clearly visible to an
ordinarily observant person indicating the restriction or
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 21
iiiiiiiininiMiiniiiiii

Page 22 2021
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D, 2
C.D. 1
proMb-ition g-hall bo pljccd along bicy&jre—pa-tfe&-so—designated
and-ove-r-y-fflopod driv-or shall obey the directions thereof.
-- Thi-s section shall--not--apply to a throo-whoolod
moped."i
SECTION 16. Sections 249-1, 249-9.2, 286-2, 286-81, 286-
81.5, 286-102, 286-102.6, 286-108, 286-109, 286-110, 291-11,
291-22, 291-25, 291-31, 291-31.5, 291C-1, 291C-206, 431:100-103,
431:100-304, 431:100-305, 431:100-408, 431:100-101, 431:100-102,
431:100-103, 431:100-104, 431:100-105, 431:100-106, 431:100-107,
431:100-108, 431:100-201, 431:100-202, 431:100-206, 431:100-301,
437-7, 437B-1, 4811-2, and 604A-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and
the title of chapter 431, article lOO, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
are amended by substituting the term "motor-driven cycle", or
similar term, wherever the term "motor scooter", or similar
IS term, appears, as the context requires.
SECTION 17. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to
prohibit the use of mobility devices, as defined in the
7\mericans with Disabilities Act.
SECTION 18. Each county shall ensure that the definitions
pursuant to section 249-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, are adopted
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO 22
HiiiiiiiiiHimn

Page 23
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
and updated annually in its ordinances for the purposes of
vehicular tax treatment and classification.
SECTION 19. This Act does not affect rights and duties
that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that
were begun before its effective date.
SECTION 20. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 21. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 22. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that section 2 shall take effect one hundred twenty
days after the effective date of this Act, or earlier upon the
adoption of rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised
Statutes.
2026-2941 HB2021 CDl HMSO
iiiniiiniiiiiiiiiiniBiiii

2021
H.B. NO
H.
S.
C.
Q
ci
Q
CM
CM
•>-
APPROVED this 15th day of My ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2021, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2021, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
10-26